Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 4
LICENSE PLATE AUCTIONS

42-1-401 to 42-1-407. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire part repealed, (HB 16-1362), ch. 319, p. 1296, § 2, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This part 4 was added in 2011. For amendments to this part 4 prior to its repeal in 2016, consult the 2015 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. This part 4 was relocated to part 22 of article 30 of title 24. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.